Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-419
Sale, lease, or license of dark fiber; authorized.

In addition to the powers authorized by sections 18-401 to 18-418 and any ordinances or resolutions relating to the provision of electric service, any city or village owning or operating electric generation or transmission facilities may sell, lease, or license its dark fiber pursuant to sections 86-574 to 86-578.

Laws 2001, LB 827, § 8;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 419;

Laws 2024, LB61, § 1.